Hawaii statutes.
PART III.
TRANSFER OF GUARDIANSHIP OR CONSERVATORSHIP

Note

Part applies to proceedings begun before September 1, 2014,
regardless of whether a guardianship or protective order has been issued. L
2012, c 236, §2.

[§551G-21] Transfer of guardianship or
conservatorship to another state. (a) A guardian or conservator appointed
in the State of Hawaii may petition the court to transfer the guardianship or
conservatorship to another state.

(b) Notice of a petition under subsection (a)
shall be given to the persons that would be entitled to notice of a petition in
the State of Hawaii for the appointment of a guardian or conservator.

(c) On the court's own motion or on request of
the guardian or conservator, the incapacitated or protected person, or other
person required to be notified of the petition, the court shall hold a hearing
on a petition filed pursuant to subsection (a).

(d) The court shall issue an order
provisionally granting a petition to transfer a guardianship and shall direct
the guardian to petition for guardianship in the other state if the court is
satisfied that the guardianship will be accepted by the court in the other
state and the court finds that:

(1) The incapacitated person is physically present in
or is reasonably expected to move permanently to the other state;

(2) An objection to the transfer has not been made
or, if an objection has been made, the objector has not established that the
transfer would be contrary to the interests of the incapacitated person; and

(3) Plans for care and services for the incapacitated
person in the other state are reasonable and sufficient.

(e) The court shall issue a provisional order
granting a petition to transfer a conservatorship and shall direct the
conservator to petition for conservatorship in the other state if the court is
satisfied that the conservatorship will be accepted by the court of the other
state and the court finds that:

(1) The protected person is physically present in or
is reasonably expected to move permanently to the other state, or the protected
person has a significant connection to the other state considering the factors
in section 551G-11(b);

(2) An objection to the transfer has not been made
or, if an objection has been made, the objector has not established that the
transfer would be contrary to the interests of the protected person; and

(3) Adequate arrangements will be made for management
of the protected person's property.

(f) The court shall issue a final order
confirming the transfer and terminating the guardianship or conservatorship
upon its receipt of:

(1) A provisional order from the court to which the
proceeding is to be transferred that accepts the proceeding and is issued under
provisions similar to section 551G-22; and

(2) The documents required to terminate a
guardianship or conservatorship in the State of Hawaii. [L 2012, c 236, pt of
§1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next